Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2910
Controlled movement, defined.

Controlled movement means a temporary movement restriction controlling the movement of animals, animal products, and fomites into, within, and out of a regulatory control area where affected animals, herds, or flocks are or were located.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 10.